Utah statutes.
53A-1-902.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1) (a)  "Cost" means an estimation of state and local monies required to
implement a federal education agreement.
(b)  "Cost" does not include capital costs associated with implementing a
federal education agreement.
(2)  "Education entities" means the entities that may bear the state and local
costs of implementing a federal program, including:
(a)  the State Board of Education;
(b)  the state superintendent and the State Office of Education;
(c)  a local school board;
(d)  a school district and its schools;
(e)  a charter school governing board; and
(f)  a charter school.
(3)  "Federal education agreement" means a legally binding document or
representation that requires a school official to implement a federal program
that originates from the U.S. Department of Education and that has, as a
primary focus, an impact on the educational services at a district or charter
school.
(4)  "Federal programs" include:
(a)  the No Child Left Behind Act;
(b)  the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act Amendments of 1997,
Public Law 105-17, and subsequent amendments; and
(c)  other federal educational programs.
(5)  "No Child Left Behind Act" means the No Child Left Behind Act of 2001, 20
U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.
(6)  "School official" includes:
(a)  the State Board of Education;
(b)  the state superintendent;
(c)  employees of the State Board of Education and the state superintendent;
(d)  local school boards;
(e)  school district superintendents and employees; and
(f)  charter school board members, administrators, and employees.
